Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 5

Discrimination in Public Accommodations

4-21-501. Discrimination prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, it is a discriminatory practice for a person to deny an individual the full and equal enjoyment of the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages and accommodations of a place of public accommodation, resort or amusement, as defined in this chapter, on the grounds of race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 13; T.C.A., § 4-2111; Acts 1980, ch. 732, § 9; T.C.A., §4-21-111.

Law Reviews.

Perceived Disabilities, Social Cognition, and “Innocent Mistakes,” 55 Vand. L. Rev. 481 (2002).

Proving an Employer's Intent: Disparate Treatment Discrimination and the Stray Remarks Doctrine After Reeves v. Sanderson Plumbing Products, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 219 (2002).

The Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988: The Second Generation of Fair Housing (James A. Kushner), 42 Vand. L. Rev. 1049 (1989).

The Sins of Innocence in Standing Doctrine, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 297 (2015).

Affirmatively Furthering Neighborhood Choice: Vacant Property Strategies and Fair Housing, 46 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1009 (2016).

Attorney General Opinions. Public establishments’ denial of admittance to persons wearing motorcycle club insignia. OAG 13-5, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 54 (7/12/13).

4-21-502. Advertisement indicating discriminatory policy.

It is a discriminatory practice for a person, directly or indirectly, to publish, circulate, issue, display or mail or cause to be published, circulated, issued, displayed or mailed a written, printed, oral or visual communication, notice or advertisement that indicates that the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages and accommodations or a place of public accommodation, resort or amusement will be refused, withheld from or denied an individual on account of the individual's race, creed, color, religion, sex or national origin; or that the patronage of, or presence at, a place of public accommodation, resort or amusement, of an individual on account of the individual's race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin is objectionable, unwelcome, unacceptable or undesirable.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 14; T.C.A., § 4-2112; Acts 1980, ch. 732, § 9; T.C.A., §4-21-112.

4-21-503. Segregation on basis of sex.

Nothing in this part shall prohibit segregation on the basis of sex of bathrooms, health clubs, rooms for sleeping or changing clothes, or other places of public accommodation the commission specifically exempts on the basis of bona fide considerations of public policy.

Acts 1978, ch. 748, § 15; T.C.A., §§ 4-2113, 4-21-113.